Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8305
Health care services, defined.

Health care services means services associated with the diagnosis and treatment of physical, mental, or emotional injury or illness or the prevention, rehabilitation, or continuing care related to health problems.

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 111.